Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-135
Commission order; authentication.

When certified to be a true and correct copy of the original by the executive director of the commission or a commissioner, a commission order shall be admitted in evidence in all courts and tribunals of this state, without further proof, as prima facie evidence of every fact found and that such order is prima facie just and reasonable.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 35, p. 1368;

Laws 1967, c. 479, § 10, p. 1480;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 48.